Maryland, session 2026, HB1547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
6–819.
(a) The modified risk reduction standard shall consist of performing the following:
(1) Passing the test for lead–contaminated dust under § 6–816 of this
subtitle; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1547*

HOUSE BILL 1547
(2) Performing the following lead hazard reduction treatments:
(i) A visual review of all exterior and interior painted surfaces;
(ii) The removal and repainting of chipping, peeling, or flaking paint
on exterior and interior painted surfaces;
(iii) The repair of any structural defect that is causing the paint to
chip, peel, or flake, that the owner of the affected property has knowledge of or, with the
exercise of reasonable care, should have knowledge of;
(iv) Repainting, replacing, or encapsulating all interior lead–based
paint or untested painted windowsills with vinyl, metal, or any other material in a manner
and under conditions approved by the Department;
(v) Ensuring that caps of vinyl, aluminum, or any other material in
a manner and under conditions approved by the Department, are installed in all window
wells where lead–based paint or untested paint exists in order to make the window wells
smooth and cleanable;
(vi) Except for a treated or replacement window that is free of
lead–based paint on its friction surfaces, fixing the top sash, subject to federal, State, or
local fire code standards, of all windows in place in order to eliminate the friction caused
by the movement of the top sash;
(vii) Rehanging all doors in order to prevent the rubbing together of a
lead–painted surface with another surface;
(viii) Ensuring that all kitchen and bathroom floors are overlaid with
a smooth, water–resistant covering; and
(ix) HEPA–vacuuming and washing with high phosphate detergent
or its equivalent, as determined by the Department, any area of the affected property where
repairs were made.
(c) (1) After February 23, 1996, an owner of an affected property shall satisfy
the modified risk reduction standard:
(i) Within 30 days after receipt of written notice that a person at
risk who resides in the property:
1. Has an elevated blood lead level documented by a test for
EBL greater than or equal to 15 µg/dl before February 24, 2006 or greater than or equal to
10 µg/dl between February 24, 2006 and June 30, 2020; or

HOUSE BILL 1547 3
2. Has an elevated blood lead level documented by a test for
elevated blood lead level greater than or equal to the reference level defined in § 6–801(q)
of this title on or after July 1, 2020[, and an environmental investigation conducted under
§ 6–305 of this title has concluded that there is a defect at the affected property]; or
(ii) Within 30 days after receipt of written notice from the tenant, or
from any other source, of:
1. A defect; and
2. The existence of a person at risk in the affected property.
(2) (i) An owner who receives multiple notices of an elevated blood lead
level under this subsection or multiple notices of defect under subsection (d) of this section
may satisfy all such notices by subsequent compliance with the risk reduction measures
specified in subsection (a) of this section, as documented by satisfaction of subsection (f) or
(g) of this section, if the owner complies with the risk reduction measures specified in
subsection (a) of this section after the date of the test documenting the elevated blood lead
level or after the date the notices of defect were issued.
(ii) Subparagraph (i) of this paragraph does not affect an owner’s
obligation to perform the risk reduction measures specified in subsection (a) of this section
for a triggering event that occurs after the owner satisfies the provisions of subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.